Wisconsin, session 2025, SB316.
do enact as follows:SB316,11Section 1. 23.09 (19) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,2,6223.09 (19) (d) Except as provided in par. (dm) and s. 23.096 (2m), grants under 3this subsection shall be for up to 50 percent of the acquisition costs of the land or the 4rights in land for the urban green space. The governmental unit is responsible for 5the remainder of the acquisition costs and no more than 30 percent of that 6remainder may be paid from funding provided by grants or in-kind contributions.SB316,27Section 2. 23.09 (19) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB316,2,12823.09 (19) (dm) If a governmental unit applies for a grant under this 9subsection after closing on the acquisition of the land or rights in land in question, 10the grant under this subsection shall be for no more than 40 percent of those 11acquisition costs, and no more than 30 percent of the remainder of those acquisition 12costs may be paid from funding provided by grants or in-kind contributions.SB316,313Section 3. 23.09 (20) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,3,91423.09 (20) (b) Except as provided in par. (bm) and s. 23.096 (2m), state aid 15under this subsection is limited to no more than 50 percent of the acquisition costs 16and the development costs of recreation lands and other outdoor recreation 17facilities. If a recipient of state aid under this subsection is a governmental unit, no 18more than 30 percent of the remainder of those costs may be paid from funding 1provided by grants or in-kind contributions. Costs associated with operation and 2maintenance of parks and other outdoor recreational facilities established under 3this subsection are not eligible for state aid. Administrative costs of acquiring lands 4or land rights are not included in the acquisition costs eligible for state aid under 5this subsection. Title to lands or rights in lands acquired by a municipality under 6this subsection shall vest in the municipality, but such land shall not be converted 7to uses inconsistent with this subsection without prior approval of the state and 8proceeds from the sale or other disposal of such lands shall be used to promote the 9objectives of this subsection.SB316,410Section 4. 23.09 (20) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB316,3,151123.09 (20) (bm) If a governmental unit applies for state aid under this 12subsection after closing on the acquisition of the land or rights in land in question, 13the state aid under this subsection is limited to no more than 40 percent of those 14acquisition costs and no more than 30 percent of the remainder of those costs may 15be paid from funding provided by grants or in-kind contributions.SB316,516Section 5. 23.09 (20m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,3,241723.09 (20m) (b) The department shall establish a program to award grants 18from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (5) (hu) or 20.866 (2) (ta) to governmental 19units and nonprofit conservation organizations to acquire development rights in 20land for nature-based outdoor recreation. Except as provided in par. (c) and s. 2123.096 (2m), the grants shall be limited to no more than 50 percent of the 22acquisition costs of the development rights, and no more than 30 percent of the 23remainder of those acquisition costs may be paid from funding provided by grants 24or in-kind contributions.SB316,61Section 6. 23.09 (20m) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB316,4,6223.09 (20m) (c) If a governmental unit applies for a grant under this 3subsection after closing on the acquisition of the development rights in question, 4the grant under this subsection is limited to no more than 40 percent of those 5acquisition costs, and no more than 30 percent of the remainder of those acquisition 6costs may be paid from funding provided by grants or in-kind contributions.SB316,77Section 7. 23.0915 (2p) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,4,13823.0915 (2p) Upper Whiting Park. From the appropriation under s. 20.866 9(2) (tz), the department shall provide to the village of Whiting $38,000 in fiscal year 101999-2000 for the development of Upper Whiting Park. Notwithstanding s. 23.09 11(20) (b), the 50 percent matching requirement under s. 23.09 (20) (b) does not apply 12to the state aid provided under this subsection. For purposes of sub. (1), moneys 13provided under this subsection shall be treated as moneys for local park aids.SB316,814Section 8. 23.0917 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,4,181523.0917 (1) (e) “Obligate” means to encumber or otherwise commit public debt 16that the state is authorized to contract or to expend public debt that the state is 17authorized to contract without having previously encumbered or otherwise 18committed that public debt.SB316,919Section 9. 23.0917 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,4,242023.0917 (3) (a) Beginning with fiscal year 2000-01 and ending with fiscal year 212025-26 2029-30, the department may obligate moneys under the subprogram for 22land acquisition to acquire land for the purposes specified in s. 23.09 (2) (d) and 23grants for these purposes under s. 23.096, except as provided under ss. 23.197 (2m), 24(3m) (b), (7m), and (8) and 23.198 (1) (a).SB316,101Section 10. 23.0917 (3) (br) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB316,5,3223.0917 (3) (br) 3. For each fiscal year beginning with 2026-27 and ending 3with 2029-30, $2,000,000.SB316,114Section 11. 23.0917 (3) (bt) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,5,8523.0917 (3) (bt) 3. For each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2022-23 and 6ending with fiscal year 2025-26, $1,000,000 plus the amount transferred to the 7capital improvement fund under s. 20.370 (5) (hq), 2023 stats., in that fiscal year. In 8this subdivision, “obligate” has the meaning given in s. 23.0917 (1) (e), 2023 stats.SB316,129Section 12. 23.0917 (3) (bu) of the statutes is created to read:SB316,5,131023.0917 (3) (bu) During the period beginning with fiscal year 2026-27 and 11ending with fiscal year 2029-30, in obligating moneys under the subprogram for 12land acquisition, the department shall set aside $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to be 13obligated only for the department to acquire land.SB316,1314Section 13. 23.0917 (3) (bw) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,5,201523.0917 (3) (bw) 2. In obligating moneys under the subprogram for land 16acquisition, for each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2022-23 and ending with 17fiscal year 2025-26, the department shall set aside the amount transferred to the 18capital improvement fund under s. 20.370 (5) (hr), 2023 stats., in that fiscal year to 19be obligated only to provide grants to counties under s. 23.0953. In this subdivision, 20“obligate” has the meaning given in s. 23.0917 (1) (e), 2023 stats.SB316,1421Section 14. 23.0917 (3) (dm) 9. of the statutes is created to read:SB316,5,232223.0917 (3) (dm) 9. For each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2026-27 23and ending with fiscal year 2029-30, $3,000,000.SB316,1524Section 15. 23.0917 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB316,6,5123.0917 (4) (a) Beginning with fiscal year 2000-01 and ending with fiscal year 22025-26 2029-30, the department may obligate moneys under the subprogram for 3property development and local assistance. Moneys obligated under this 4subprogram may be only used for nature-based outdoor recreation, except as 5provided under par. (cm).SB316,166Section 16. 23.0917 (4) (d) 1m. g. of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb316 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb316 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB316 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB316 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB316: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting